Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.450

Applicable fees, charges, and penalties.

Corporations are subject to the applicable fees, charges, and penalties established by the secretary of state under RCW 23.95.260 and 43.07.120.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4132; 2010 1st sp.s. c 29 s 4; 1993 c 269 s 7; 1991 c 223 s 2; 1982 c 35 s 154; 1981 c 230 s 6; 1973 c 70 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 90.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Intent—2010 1st sp.s. c 29: "It is the intent of the legislature to restructure certain fees for the division of corporations of the office of the secretary of state in a manner that has minimal revenue impact but moves the division of corporations towards a more self-sustaining budget." [ 2010 1st sp.s. c 29 s 1.]

Effective date—1993 c 269: See note following RCW 23.86.070.

Effective date—1991 c 223: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on July 1, 1991." [ 1991 c 223 s 4.]

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.